Illinois, session 104th, SB4087.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly:  4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. In addition to other sums appropriated, the sum 6of $37,204,600, or so much thereof as may be necessary, is 7appropriated from the General Revenue Fund to the State Board 8of Elections for operational expenses, grants, and 9reimbursements for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2027. 10    Section 10. The sum of $1,000,000, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, is appropriated from the Elections Special 12Projects Fund to the State Board of Elections for operational 13expenses, grants, and reimbursements, except that this amount 14shall not exceed funds made available. 15    Section 15. The following amounts, or so much of those 16amounts as may be necessary, respectively, are appropriated 17from the Personal Property Tax Replacement Fund to the State 18Board of Elections for its ordinary and contingent expenses as 19follows: 20  For reimbursement to counties for increased   SB4087- 2 -SDS104 00057 NBW 10057 b1   compensation for judges and other election2   officials, as provided in Public Acts 81-850, 3   81-1149, 90-672, and 103-0008 - Election Day 4   Judges only.....................................$4,226,000 5  For payment of lump sum awards to 6   counties, s provided in subsection (d) of Section 4-60017   of the Counties Code .............................$747,5008    Total                                          $4,973,500 9    Section 20. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 10may be necessary, are appropriated from the Help Illinois Vote 11Fund to the State Board of Elections for implementation of the 12Help America Vote Act of 2002: 13  For the maintenance of the statewide 14   voter registration system, as required 15   by Section 1A-25 of the Election 16   Code, including administrative and 17   programmatic costs associated with 18   voter registration activities..................$1,036,100  19  For administrative costs and discretionary 20   grants to local election authorities 21   under the HAVA Election Security Grant,22   including prior years' costs...................$10,625,000  SB4087- 3 -SDS104 00057 NBW 10057 b1    Total                                         $11,661,100 2    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 32026.